Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.660

Procedures for adoption of controls limited to planning matters.

The provisions of this chapter with references to the procedures to be followed in the adoption of official controls shall apply only to establishing official controls pertaining to subjects set forth in RCW 36.70.560.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.660. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 66.]